Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-712.04
Public records; denial of rights; public body; provide information.

(1) Any person denied any rights granted by sections 84-712 to 84-712.03 shall receive in written form from the public body which denied the request for records at least the following information:

(a) A description of the contents of the records withheld and a statement of the specific reasons for the denial, correlating specific portions of the records to specific reasons for the denial, including citations to the particular statute and subsection thereof expressly providing the exception under section 84-712.01 relied on as authority for the denial;

(b) The name of the public official or employee responsible for the decision to deny the request; and

(c) Notification to the requester of any administrative or judicial right of review under section 84-712.03.

(2) Each public body shall maintain a file of all letters of denial of requests for records. This file shall be made available to any person on request.

Laws 1979, LB 86, § 4;

Laws 1983, LB 3, § 1.